Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-115
Registered voter, defined.

Registered voter shall mean an elector who has a valid voter registration record on file with the election commissioner or county clerk in the county of his or her residence.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 11.

"Inactive" registered voters must be counted as registered voters until their names are legally removed from the voter rolls. State ex rel. Bellino v. Moore, 254 Neb. 385, 576 N.W.2d 793 (1998).